Utah statutes.
52-5-201.   Reporting of funds -- Reports are public records.

(1) (a)  By January 5 of each year, each state elected official who has a fund, each multicounty elected official who has a fund, each surrogate for a state elected official who has a fund for a state elected official, and each surrogate for a multicounty elected official who has a fund for a multicounty elected official shall file a funds report containing the information required by this section with the lieutenant governor.

(b)  By January 5 of each year, each local elected official who has a fund and each surrogate for a local elected official who has a fund for a local elected official shall file a funds report containing the information required by this section with the county clerk of the county in which the local elected official exercises the locally elected official’s official duties.

(2)  Each report shall contain:

(a)  the dollar value of the fund as of December 31 of the previous year;

(b)  an itemized list of disbursements from the fund during the previous calendar year identifying:

(i)  the date of each disbursement;

(ii)  the name and address of each person or entity to whom a disbursement was made; and

(iii)  the purpose of each disbursement; and

(c)  an itemized list of contributions to the fund during the previous calendar year, identifying:

(i)  the date of each contribution; and

(ii)  the name and address of each person or entity from whom a contribution was received.

(3)  Reports filed under this section are classified as public records for purposes of disclosure under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

